Tennessee, session 114, HB0394.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 68-211-814(a)(3), is amended by
adding the following sentence at the end of the subdivision:
The department shall make available the annual progress reports received
pursuant to this subdivision (a)(3) in a publicly accessible location on the
department's website.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0394
001842
- 1 -